Nebraska, session 109, LB69.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-2601, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2601 (1) There is hereby established the Commission on African American
Affairs. For purposes of sections 81-2601 to 81-2607, commission means the
Commission on African American Affairs.
(2) The commission shall consist of fourteen members who shall be of
African ancestry. Members of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor.
One member of the commission shall, at the time of initial appointment, be an
individual who identifies as an immigrant or new American, and one member
shall, at the time of initial appointment, be a young professional eighteen
years of age or older and younger than twenty-five years of age. The commission
may have such nonvoting, ex officio members as shall be appointed by the
commission and who need not be of African ancestry. The commission shall elect
one of its members as chairperson.
(3) Members of the commission shall serve no more than two full, four-year
terms or for the unexpired term in the event of a vacancy. As the terms of the
voting members expire, their successors shall be appointed by the Governor from
a panel of nominees submitted by the public. An appointment for an unexpired
term shall follow the same procedure as for initial and subsequent
appointments. Voting members shall be eligible for reappointment.
(4) The names of all commissioners shall be listed on the commission's
website.
Sec. 2. Section 81-2602, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-2602 The purpose of the commission is to join representatives of
African Americans and Black Americans across the diaspora in Nebraska to do all
things which the commission may determine to enhance the well-being of African
Americans cause of African American rights and to develop proactive solutions
to problems common to all Nebraska African Americans.
Sec. 3. Section 81-2603, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-2603 The commission may receive and administer funds from state,
federal, and other sources and may employ and fix the compensation of personnel
an executive director of its own choosing who shall be an African American
person and a legal resident of the State of Nebraska. An office for the
executive management director shall be provided.
Sec. 4. Section 81-2604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-2604 The functions of the commission are to:
(1) Promote state and federal legislation beneficial to the African
American community in Nebraska;
(2) Coordinate new and existing programs relating to the African American
community in Nebraska regarding key opportunities including, but not limited
to, housing, education, welfare, medical and dental care, employment, economic
development, law and order, and related themes problems;
(3) Work with other state and federal government agencies and federal and
state elected officials in the development of programs in areas mentioned in
subdivision (2) of this section;
(4) Keep the Governor's office apprised of the situation in the African
American community in Nebraska;
(5) Administer sections 81-2601 to 81-2607;
(6) Provide the public with information and education relevant to African
American affairs in Nebraska; and
(7) Develop initiatives programs to encourage the total involvement of
African American people in activities for the common benefit of the African
American community.
Sec. 5. Section 81-2606, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-2606 (1) The commission shall meet at least quarterly. At least one of
such meetings once every calendar year shall be in the city in Nebraska with
the largest African American population. In addition to the requirements of the
Open Meetings Act, public notice of a meeting shall be required no later than
seven calendar days prior to the date of such meeting and shall be published on
the commission's website and social media and shared with local media outlets
quarter. Meetings shall be held in January, April, July, and October. Special
meetings may be called at the request of eight voting members. Eight voting
-1-

LB69 LB69
2025 2025
members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business. Commission meeting minutes shall be posted on the commission's
website.
(2) The office of any member of the commission who, without a valid
excuse, fails to attend annual quarterly or special meetings shall be vacant.
(3) The commission shall electronically submit an annual report to the
Governor and the Clerk of the Legislature containing a summary of the
following:
(a) An overview of the commission's mission, key achievements, challenges,
and primary goals for the coming year;
(b) Legislative advocacy and policy impact including the commission's role
in supporting or proposing legislation, policies for which the commission
advocated, supported, or implemented that impacted the African American
community, and the progress made on the policies described in sections 81-2601
to 81-2607;
(c) Community engagement programs including initiatives, outreach, public
forums, and partnerships with community organizations;
(d) Economic development initiatives including efforts to improve economic
opportunities within the African American community, employment programs, small
business support, training, and progress in reducing economic disparities;
(e) Education and workforce development including educational initiatives,
such as scholarships, mentoring programs, partnerships with schools, and
efforts to ensure African American youth and adults have access to career
advancement opportunities;
(f) Health and wellness initiatives including programs that address health
disparities, wellness promotion, and increasing access to health care
resources;
(g) Criminal justice and public safety efforts including those that
address disparities in the criminal justice system, programs for formerly
incarcerated individuals, and improvements in police-community relations;
(h) Housing and community development including initiatives to address
issues such as affordable housing, eviction prevention efforts, and
partnerships with housing agencies;
(i) Metrics and key performance indicators including data that
demonstrates the impact of each program or initiative, such as employment
rates, graduation rates, health outcomes, and recidivism rates in the African
American community;
(j) Financial information including the commission's budget, funding
sources, expenditures, grants received, and public funds allocated;
(k) Public feedback and a community needs assessment including feedback
from the community on the effectiveness of the commission's work and priority
areas for improvement; and
(l) Future goals and strategic plans including goals for the upcoming year
and long-term objectives with a focus on addressing challenges and advancing
the commission's mission.
Sec. 6. Section 81-2607, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-2607 (1) For purposes of administration of the commission during the
interim between regular quarterly meetings, there is hereby established an
executive board of the Commission on African American Affairs consisting of the
chairperson of the commission and four members of the commission.
(2) The executive board may enter into contracts for consultation
services, supplies, and equipment, if the amount contracted for does not exceed
two thousand dollars in any one contract, and may supervise all initiatives
programs relating to the affairs of African American people instituted and
authorized by the commission.
Sec. 7. Original sections 81-2601, 81-2602, 81-2603, 81-2604, 81-2606,
and 81-2607, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-2-